New Jersey, session 221, S3391.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. Section 8 of P.L.1973, c.83 (C.19:44A-8) is amended to read as follows: 8. a. (1) Each political committee shall make a full cumulative report, upon a form prescribed by the Election Law Enforcement Commission, of all contributions in excess of $200 in the form of moneys, loans, paid personal services, or other things of value made to it and all expenditures made, incurred, or authorized by it in furtherance of the nomination, election, or defeat of any candidate, or in aid of the passage or defeat of any public question, or to provide political information on any candidate or public question, during the period ending 48 hours preceding the date of the report and beginning on the date on which the first of those contributions was received or the first of those expenditures was made, whichever occurred first.  The cumulative report, except as hereinafter provided, shall contain the name and mailing address of each person or group from whom moneys, loans, paid personal services or other things of value in excess of $200 have been contributed since 48 hours preceding the date on which the previous such report was made and the amount contributed by each person or group, and where the contributor is an individual, the report shall indicate the occupation of the individual and the name and mailing address of the individual's employer.  In the case of any loan reported pursuant to this subsection, the report shall contain the name and mailing address of each person who has cosigned such loan since 48 hours preceding the date on which the previous such report was made, and where an individual has cosigned such loans, the report shall indicate the occupation of the individual and the name and mailing address of the individual's employer.  The cumulative report shall also contain the name and address of each person, firm or organization to whom expenditures have been paid since 48 hours preceding the date on which the previous such report was made and the amount and purpose of each such expenditure.  The cumulative report shall be filed with the Election Law Enforcement Commission on the dates designated in section 16 hereof. The campaign treasurer of the political committee reporting shall certify to the correctness of each report. Each campaign treasurer of a political committee shall file written notice with the commission of a contribution in excess of $200 received during the period between the 13th day prior to the election and the date of the election, and of an expenditure of money or other thing of value in excess of $200 made, incurred or authorized by the political committee to support or defeat a candidate in an election, or to aid the passage or defeat of any public question, during the period between the 13th day prior to the election and the date of the election.  The notice of a contribution shall be filed in writing or by electronic transmission within 72 hours of the receipt of the contribution when the contribution is received between the 13th day and the eighth day prior to the election, or within 24 hours of the receipt of the contribution when the contribution is received between the seventh day prior to the election and the date of the election. The notice shall set forth the amount and date of the contribution, the name and mailing address of the contributor, and where the contributor is an individual, the individual's occupation and the name and mailing address of the individual's employer.  The notice of an expenditure shall be filed in writing or by electronic transmission within 72 hours of the making, incurring or authorization of the expenditure when the expenditure is made, incurred, or authorized between the 13th day and the eighth day prior to the election, or within 24 hours when the expenditure is made, incurred, or authorized between the seventh day prior to the election and the date of the election.  The notice shall set forth the name and mailing address of the person, firm or organization to whom or which the expenditure was paid and the amount and purpose of the expenditure. (2) When a political committee or an individual seeking party office makes or authorizes an expenditure on behalf of a candidate, it shall provide immediate written notification to the candidate of the expenditure. b. (1) A group of two or more persons acting jointly, or any corporation, partnership, or any other incorporated or unincorporated association including a political club, political action committee, civic association or other organization, which in any calendar year contributes or expects to contribute at least $2,500.00 to the aid or promotion of the candidacy of an individual, or of the candidacies of individuals, for elective public office or the passage or defeat of a public question or public questions and which expects to make contributions toward such aid or promotion, or toward such passage or defeat, during a subsequent election shall certify that fact to the commission, and the commission, upon receiving that certification and on the basis of any information as it may require of the group, corporation, partnership, association or other organization, shall determine whether the group, corporation, partnership, association or other organization is a continuing political committee for the purposes of this act.  If the commission determines that the group, corporation, partnership, association or other organization is a continuing political committee, it shall so notify that continuing political committee. No person serving as the chairman of a political party committee or a legislative leadership committee shall be eligible to be appointed or to serve as the chairman of a continuing political committee. (2) A continuing political committee shall file with the Election Law Enforcement Commission, not later than April 15, July 15, October 15 and January 15 of each calendar year, a cumulative quarterly report of all moneys, loans, paid personal services or other things of value in excess of $200 contributed to it during the period ending on the 15th day preceding that date and commencing on January 1 of that calendar year or, in the case of the cumulative quarterly report to be filed not later than January 15, of the previous calendar year, and all expenditures made, incurred, or authorized by it during the period, whether or not such expenditures were made, incurred or authorized in furtherance of the election or defeat of any candidate, or in aid of the passage or defeat of any public question or to provide information on any candidate or public question. The cumulative quarterly report shall contain the name and mailing address of each person or group from whom moneys, loans, paid personal services or other things of value in excess of $200 have been contributed and the amount contributed by each person or group, and where an individual has made such contributions, the report shall indicate the occupation of the individual and the name and mailing address of the individual's employer.  In the case of any loan reported pursuant to this subsection, the report shall contain the name and address of each person who cosigns such loan, and where an individual has cosigned such loans, the report shall indicate the occupation of the individual and the name and mailing address of the individual's employer.  The report shall also contain the name and address of each person, firm or organization to whom expenditures have been paid and the amount and purpose of each such expenditure.  The treasurer of the continuing political committee reporting shall certify to the correctness of each cumulative quarterly report. Each continuing political committee shall provide immediate written notification to each candidate of all expenditures made or authorized on behalf of the candidate. If any continuing political committee submitting cumulative quarterly reports as provided under this subsection receives a contribution from a single source of more than $200 after the final day of a quarterly reporting period and on or before a primary, general, municipal, school or special election which occurs after that final day but prior to the final day of the next reporting period it shall, in writing or by electronic transmission, report that contribution to the commission within 72 hours of the receipt thereof if that contribution is received between the 15th day prior to that election and the day of the election, except that a contribution received between the seventh day prior to the election and the date of the election shall be reported within 24 hours of the receipt thereof, including in that report the amount and date of the contribution; the name and mailing address of the contributor; and where the contributor is an individual, the individual's occupation and the name and mailing address of the individual's employer.  If any continuing political committee makes or authorizes an expenditure of money or other thing of value in excess of $200, or incurs any obligation therefor, to support or defeat a candidate in an election, or to aid the passage or defeat of any public question, between the 15th day prior to the day of the primary election and the day of the primary election, or between the 15th day prior to the day of the general election and the day of the general election, it shall, in writing or by electronic transmission, report that expenditure to the commission within 72 hours of the making, authorizing or incurring thereof, except that an expenditure made, authorized, or incurred between the seventh day prior to the election and the date of the election shall be reported within 24 hours of the making, authorizing, or incurring thereof. A continuing political committee which ceases making contributions toward the aiding or promoting of the candidacy of an individual, or of the candidacies of individuals, for elective public office in this State or the passage or defeat of a public question or public questions in this State shall certify that fact in writing to the commission, and that certification shall be accompanied by a final accounting of any fund relating to such aiding or promoting including the final disposition of any balance in such fund at the time of dissolution.  Until that certification has been filed, the committee shall continue to file the quarterly reports as provided under this subsection. c.     Each political party committee and each legislative leadership committee shall file with the Election Law Enforcement Commission, not later than April 15, July 15, October 15 and January 15 of each calendar year, a cumulative quarterly report of all moneys, loans, paid personal services or other things of value in excess of $200 contributed to it during the period ending on the 15th day preceding that date and commencing on January 1 of that calendar year or, in the case of the cumulative quarterly report to be filed not later than January 15, of the previous calendar year, and all expenditures made, incurred, or authorized by it during the period, whether or not such expenditures were made, incurred or authorized in furtherance of the election or defeat of any candidate, or in aid of the passage or defeat of any public question or to provide information on any candidate or public question. The cumulative quarterly report shall contain the name and mailing address of each person or group from whom moneys, loans, paid personal services or other things of value in excess of $200 have been contributed and the amount contributed by each person or group, and where an individual has made such contributions, the report shall indicate the occupation of the individual and the name and mailing address of the individual's employer.  In the case of any loan reported pursuant to this subsection, the report shall contain the name and address of each person who cosigns such loan, and where an individual has cosigned such loans, the report shall indicate the occupation of the individual and the name and mailing address of the individual's employer.  The report shall also contain the name and address of each person, firm or organization to whom expenditures have been paid and the amount and purpose of each such expenditure.  The treasurer of the political party committee or legislative leadership committee reporting shall certify to the correctness of each cumulative quarterly report. d. (1) Each independent expenditure committee making an electioneering communication pertaining to a primary election shall file with the Election Law Enforcement Commission a cumulative report on the 11th day preceding the primary election, and after the primary election file a report on the 20th day following the election, upon a form prescribed by the Election Law Enforcement Commission, of all contributions received in excess of $7,500 in the form of moneys, loans, paid personal services, or other things of value made to it for the purpose of furthering the independent expenditure, and of all independent expenditures made, incurred, or authorized by it beginning on the first day of the preceding calendar year and ending on the reporting date. Each independent expenditure committee making an electioneering communication pertaining to a municipal, runoff, school board, special, or general election shall file with the Election Law Enforcement Commission a cumulative report on the 29th day preceding the election, a report on the 11th day preceding the election, and after the election file a report on the 20th day following the election, upon a form prescribed by the Election Law Enforcement Commission, of all contributions received in excess of $7,500 in the form of moneys, loans, paid personal services, or other things of value made to it for the purpose of furthering the independent expenditure, and of all independent expenditures made, incurred, or authorized by it beginning on the first day of the preceding calendar year and ending on the reporting date.  The report, except as hereinafter provided, shall contain the name and mailing address of each person or group from whom moneys, loans, paid personal services or other things of value have been contributed since 48 hours preceding the date on which such previous report was made and the amount contributed by each person or group in excess of $7,500, and when the contributor is an individual, the report shall indicate the occupation of the individual and the name and mailing address of the individual's employer.  In the case of any loan reported pursuant to this subsection, the report shall contain the name and mailing address of each person who has cosigned such loan since 48 hours preceding the date on which the previous such report was made, and when an individual has cosigned such loans, the report shall indicate the occupation of the individual and the name and mailing address of the individual's employer.  The report shall also contain the name and address of each person, firm, or organization to whom expenditures have been paid since 48 hours preceding the date on which the previous such report was made and the amount and purpose of each such expenditure. (2) When an independent expenditure committee receives a contribution from a single source of more than $7,500 after the final day of a cumulative reporting period and on or before a primary, municipal, runoff, school board, special, or general election which occurs after that final day but prior to the final day of the next reporting period it shall, in writing or by electronic transmission, report that contribution to the commission within 72 hours of the receipt thereof if that contribution is received between the 15th day prior to that election and the day of the election, except that a contribution received between the seventh day prior to the election and the date of the election shall be reported within 24 hours of the receipt thereof, including in that report the amount and date of the contribution; the name and mailing address of the contributor; and, where the contributor is an individual, the individuals occupation and the name and mailing address of the individuals employer.  When an independent expenditure committee makes or authorizes an independent expenditure of more than $200, or incurs any obligation therefor, between the 15th day prior to the day of a primary, municipal, runoff, school board, special, or general election and the day of that election, it shall, in writing or by electronic transmission, report that independent expenditure to the commission within 72 hours of the making, authorizing, or incurring thereof, except that an independent expenditure made, authorized, or incurred between the seventh day prior to the election and the date of the election shall be reported within 24 hours of the making, authorizing, or incurring thereof. (3) Each independent expenditure committee required to file the reports specified under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection shall also file with the Election Law Enforcement Commission, following each election but not later than April 15, July 15, October 15 and January 15 of each calendar year, a cumulative quarterly report of all moneys, loans, paid personal services or other things of value in excess of $7,500 contributed to it during the period ending on the 15th day preceding that date and commencing on January 1 of that calendar year or, in the case of the cumulative quarterly report to be filed not later than January 15, of the previous calendar year, and all expenditures made, incurred, or authorized by it during the period. The cumulative quarterly report shall contain the name and mailing address of each person or group from whom moneys, loans, paid personal services or other things of value in excess of $7,500 have been contributed and the amount contributed by each person or group, and where an individual has made such contributions, the report shall indicate the occupation of the individual and the name and mailing address of the individual's employer.  In the case of any loan reported pursuant to this subsection, the report shall contain the name and address of each person who cosigns such loan, and where an individual has cosigned such loans, the report shall indicate the occupation of the individual and the name and mailing address of the individual's employer.  The report shall also contain the name and address of each person, firm or organization to whom expenditures have been paid and the amount and purpose of each such expenditure.  The treasurer of the independent expenditure committee reporting shall certify to the correctness of each cumulative quarterly report. Each independent expenditure committee shall continue to file the post-election quarterly reports required under this paragraph until the closure of the committees campaign depository account. (4) The treasurer of the reporting independent expenditure committee shall certify the correctness of each report and shall maintain all records of contributions and expenditures for a period of not less than four years. The $7,500 contribution amount shall remain as stated in this subsection without further adjustment by the commission pursuant to section 22 of P.L.1993, c.65 (C.19:44A-7.2). e.     When a political party committee or legislative leadership committee receives a contribution from a single source of more than $200 after the final day of a quarterly reporting period and on or before a primary, general, municipal, school, or special election which occurs after that final day but prior to the final day of the next reporting period it shall, in writing or by electronic transmission, report that contribution to the commission within 72 hours of the receipt thereof if that contribution is received between the 15th day prior to that election and the day of the election, except that a contribution received between the seventh day prior to the election and the date of the election shall be reported within 24 hours of the receipt thereof, including in that report the amount and date of the contribution; the name and mailing address of the contributor; and where the contributor is an individual, the individual's occupation and the name and mailing address of the individual's employer.  When a political party committee or legislative leadership committee makes or authorizes an expenditure of money or other thing of value in excess of $800, or incurs any obligation therefor, to support or defeat a candidate in an election, or to aid the passage or defeat of any public question, between the 15th day prior to the day of the primary election and the day of the primary election, or between the 15th day prior to the day of the general election and the day of the general election, it shall, in writing or by electronic transmission, report that expenditure to the commission within 72 hours of the making, authorizing or incurring thereof, except that an expenditure made, authorized, or incurred between the seventh day prior to the election and the date of the election shall be reported within 24 hours of the making, authorizing, or incurring thereof. f.     In any report filed pursuant to the provisions of this section the organization or committee reporting may exclude from the report the name of and other information relating to any contributor whose contributions during the period covered by the report did not exceed $200, provided, however, that (1) such exclusion is unlawful if any person responsible for the preparation or filing of the report knew that it was made with respect to any person whose contributions relating to the same election or issue and made to the reporting organization or committee aggregate, in combination with the contribution in respect of which such exclusion is made, more than $200 and (2) any person who knowingly prepares, assists in preparing, files or acquiesces in the filing of any report from which the identification of a contributor has been excluded contrary to the provisions of this section is subject to the provisions of section 21 of P.L.1973, c.83 (C.19:44A-21), but (3) nothing in this proviso shall be construed as requiring any committee or organization reporting pursuant to this act to report the amounts, dates or other circumstantial data regarding contributions made to any other organization or political committee, political party committee or campaign organization of a candidate. g.    Any report filed pursuant to the provisions of this section shall include an itemized accounting of all receipts and expenditures relative to any testimonial affairs held since the date of the most recent report filed, which accounting shall include the name and mailing address of each contributor in excess of $200 to such testimonial affair and the amount contributed by each; in the case of an individual contributor, the occupation of the individual and the name and mailing address of the individual's employer; the expenses incurred; and the disposition of the proceeds of such testimonial affair. The $200 limit established in this subsection shall remain as stated in this subsection without further adjustment by the commission in the manner prescribed by section 22 of P.L.1993, c.65 (C.19:44A-7.2). (cf: P.L.2023, c.30, s.4) 2. This act shall take effect immediately.